Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3807
Corporation; provider contracts; file; report.

(1) Provider contracts, and changes thereto, made between a prepaid dental service corporation and any provider of services covered by any plan shall be filed with the director and shall not become effective until approved by the director.

(2) A prepaid dental service corporation shall annually report to the director, in such detail as the director reasonably requires, the number and geographical distribution of providers of services with whom they maintain contractual relations and the nature of the relations.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 7.